Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5114.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-3.1-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-3.1 entitled
"Cooperative Service Among School Districts [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board
of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-3.1-11. Urban collaborative.
(a)(1) The urban collaborative shall be governed by a board of trustees, with the exception
of those powers and duties reserved by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.
(2) The board of trustees of the urban collaborative shall consist of five (5) members
including:
(i) The superintendent of the Providence school district, or designee;
(ii) The superintendent, or designee, of any other Rhode Island school district(s) as may be
approved for inclusion by existing member districts in accordance with the urban collaborative’s
bylaws; and
(iii) The council on elementary and secondary education shall appoint the remaining
members of the board of trustees of the urban collaborative with input from the commissioner of
elementary and secondary education.
(b) The urban collaborative's board of trustees is Notwithstanding the provisions of any
general or special law to the contrary, the school committees of the cities of Providence, Pawtucket,
East Providence, Central Falls and other Rhode Island school districts as may be approved for
inclusion by existing member districts in accordance with collaborative bylaws are authorized and

empowered to continue and/or initiate cooperative efforts to provide alternate education programs
and/or diagnostic services required by law or regulation for students achieving limited success in
traditional settings and to do all things necessary including, but not limited to utilization of
technology, including television, all on a collaborative basis. The various school committees may
assign and delegate to their respective school committee chairs or designee or superintendents of
schools or designee, acting as a regional board any duties, responsibilities, and powers that the
committees may deem necessary for the conduct, administration, and management of the urban
collaborative. Beginning on July 1, 2013 the urban collaborative shall be funded pursuant to the
provisions of § 16-7.2-3. The state share of the permanent foundation education aid shall be paid
directly to the urban collaborative pursuant to the provisions of § 16-7.2-7. The local school district
shall transfer the difference between the calculated state share of the permanent foundation
education aid and the amount calculated pursuant to the provisions of § 16-7.2-7 to the urban
collaborative, until the transition of the state share is complete. In addition, the local school district
shall pay the local share of education funding to the urban collaborative as outlined in § 16-7.2-5.
The urban collaborative shall be eligible to receive other aids, grants, Medicaid revenue,
and any other revenue according to Rhode Island law, as though it were a school district. Federal
aid received by the state shall be used to benefit students in the urban collaborative, if the school
qualifies for the aid, as though it were a school district.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000100
========
LC000100 - Page 2 of 3